Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
ARTICLE 3.3
OFFICE OF THE CHILD PROTECTION OMBUDSMAN

Section

19-3.3-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Child abuse and neglect is a serious and reprehensible problem in society;

The protection of children from abuse and neglect by applying prevention measures and observing best practices in treating children who are abused and neglected must be one of Colorado's highest public policy priorities;

The child protection system must protect and serve Colorado's children in a manner that keeps them safe and healthy and promotes their well-being;

The children and families served by the child protection system, as well as the public, must have a high level of confidence that the system will act in a child's best interests and will respond to the child's needs in a timely and professional manner;

To engender this high level of confidence in the child protection system, it is important that children and families who become involved in the system, mandatory reporters, and the general public have a well-publicized, easily accessible, and transparent
grievance process for voicing concerns regarding the child protection system along with the expectation that those concerns, once voiced, will be heard and addressed in a timely and appropriate manner; and

To improve child protection outcomes and to foster best practices, there must be effective accountability mechanisms, including the review and evaluation of concerns voiced by children and families, mandatory reporters, persons involved in the child protection
system, and members of the general public, that provide policymakers with the information necessary to formulate systemic changes, where appropriate.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the establishment of the office of the child protection ombudsman will:

Improve accountability and transparency in the child protection system and promote better outcomes for children and families involved in the child protection system; and

Allow families, concerned citizens, mandatory reporters, employees of the state department and county departments, and other professionals who work with children and families to voice their concerns, without fear of reprisal, about the response by the
child protection system to children experiencing, or at risk of experiencing, child maltreatment.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 974, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2015:
IP(2) amended, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, p. 1031, § 14, effective June 2.

19-3.3-102. Office of the child protection ombudsman established - child protection ombudsman advisory board - qualifications of ombudsman - duties.

The independent office of the child protection ombudsman, referred to in this article 3.3 as the "office", is established in the judicial department as an independent agency for the purpose of ensuring the greatest protections for the children of Colorado.

The office and the judicial department shall operate pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the two entities. The memorandum of understanding contains, at a minimum:

A requirement that the office has its own personnel rules;

A requirement that the ombudsman has independent hiring and termination authority over office employees;

A requirement that the office must follow judicial fiscal rules;

A requirement that the office of the state court administrator shall offer the office of the child protection ombudsman limited support with respect to:

Personnel matters;

Recruitment;

Payroll;

Benefits;

Budget submission, as needed;

Accounting; and

Office space, facilities, and technical support limited to the building that houses the office of the state court administrator; and

Any other provisions regarding administrative support that will help maintain the independence of the office.

The office and the related child protection ombudsman board, established in subsection (2) of this section, shall operate with full independence. The board and office have complete autonomy, control, and authority over operations, budget, and personnel
decisions related to the office, board, and ombudsman.

The office shall work cooperatively with the child protection ombudsman board established in subsection (2) of this section, the department of human services and other child welfare organizations, as appropriate, to form a partnership between those entities
and persons, parents, and the state for the purpose of ensuring the greatest protections for the children of Colorado.

There is established an independent, nonpartisan child protection ombudsman board, referred to in this article 3.3 as the "board". The board consists of twelve members and, to the extent practicable, must include persons from throughout the state and
persons with disabilities and must reflect the ethnic diversity of the state. All members must have child welfare policy or system expertise or experience.

The board members must be appointed as follows:

The chief justice of the Colorado supreme court shall appoint:

An individual with experience as a respondent parents' counsel;

An individual with experience defending juveniles in court proceedings;

An individual with legal experience in dependency and neglect cases; and

An individual with experience in criminal justice involving children and youth.

The governor shall appoint:

An individual with previous professional experience with a rural county human or social services agency or a rural private child welfare advocacy agency;

An individual with previous professional experience with the department of human services;

An individual with previous professional experience with an urban human or social services agency or an urban private child welfare agency; and

An individual with experience in primary or secondary education.

The president and minority leader of the senate shall appoint:

An individual who was formerly a child in the foster care system; and

An individual with professional experience as a county and community child protection advocate; and

The speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives shall appoint:

A current or former foster parent; and

A health-care professional with previous experience with child abuse and neglect cases.

Board members shall serve for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than six members' terms expire in the same year. The appointing officials shall fill any vacancies on the board for the remainder of any unexpired
term.

The board shall meet a minimum of two times per year and additionally as needed. At least one meeting per year must be held outside of the Denver metropolitan area.

Board members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for actual and reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Expenses incurred for the board must be paid from the general operating budget of the office of the child protection ombudsman.

The board has the following duties and responsibilities:

To oversee the following personnel decisions related to the ombudsman:

To appoint a person to serve as the child protection ombudsman and director of the office, referred to in this article 3.3 as the "ombudsman". The board may also discharge an acting ombudsman for cause. A two-thirds majority vote is required to hire or
discharge the ombudsman. The general assembly shall set the ombudsman's compensation, and such compensation may not be reduced during the term of the ombudsman's appointment.

Filling a vacancy in the ombudsman position;

Evaluating the ombudsman's performance as determined necessary based on feedback received related to the ombudsman; and

Developing a public complaint process related to the ombudsman's performance;

To oversee and advise the ombudsman on the strategic direction of the office and its mission and to help promote the use, engagement, and access to the office;

To work cooperatively with the ombudsman to provide fiscal oversight of the general operating budget of the office and ensure that the office operates in compliance with the provisions of this article, the memorandum of understanding, and state and federal
laws relating to the child welfare system;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2016.)

To promote the mission of the office to the public; and

To provide assistance, as practicable and as requested by the ombudsman, to facilitate the statutory intent of this article.

Meetings of the board are subject to the provisions of section 24-6-402, C.R.S., except for executive personnel actions or meetings requiring the protection of confidentiality for children's or parents' personal data pursuant to the federal "Child Abuse
Prevention and Treatment Act", Pub.L. 93-247, and state privacy laws.

The records of the board and the office are subject to the provisions of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 975, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2014:
(2)(a) amended, (SB 14-201), ch. 280, p. 1137, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2015:
Entire section R&RE, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, p. 1022, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2016:
(3) amended and (1)(a.5) added, (SB 16-013), ch. 102, p. 292, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2022:
(1)(a), (2)(a), IP(2)(b), (2)(c), and (3)(a)(I) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 26, § 32, effective February 25.

19-3.3-103. Office of the child protection ombudsman - powers and duties - access to information - confidentiality - testimony - judicial review - definitions.

The ombudsman has the following duties, at a minimum:

To receive complaints concerning child protection services. For the purposes of this section, "complaint" means any report or complaint made by or on behalf of a child relating to any action, inaction, or decision of any public agency or any provider
that receives public money that may adversely affect the safety, permanency, or well-being of the child. The ombudsman may, independently and impartially, investigate a complaint, which may include complaints
about an incident of egregious abuse or neglect or near fatality, as described in section 26-1-139, or fatality of a child, as described in part 20.5 of title 25 and section 26-1-139. The ombudsman may seek
resolution of a complaint, which may include but need not be limited to referring a complaint to the state department or appropriate agency or entity and making a recommendation for action relating to a
complaint. (a) (I) (A) To receive complaints concerning child protection services. For the purposes of this section, "complaint" means any report or complaint made by or on behalf of a child relating to
any action, inaction, or decision of any public agency or any provider that receives public money that may adversely affect the safety, permanency, or well-being of the child. The ombudsman may, independently
and impartially, investigate a complaint, which may include complaints about an incident of egregious abuse or neglect or near fatality, as described in section 26-1-139, or fatality of a child, as described
in part 20.5 of title 25 and section 26-1-139. The ombudsman may seek resolution of a complaint, which may include but need not be limited to referring a complaint to the state department or appropriate
agency or entity and making a recommendation for action relating to a complaint.

The ombudsman shall treat all complaints received pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) of this section as confidential, including the identities of complainants and individuals from whom information is acquired; except that disclosures may be permitted
if the ombudsman deems it necessary to enable the ombudsman to perform the ombudsman's duties and to support any recommendations resulting from an investigation. Records relating to complaints received by
the office and the investigation of complaints are exempt from public disclosure pursuant to article 72 of title 24.

The ombudsman and any employee or person acting on behalf of the ombudsman shall not be compelled to provide oral and written testimony in a civil or criminal proceeding in which the ombudsman is not a legal party. Information, records, or documents requested
and reviewed by the ombudsman pursuant to this section are not subject to a subpoena issued to the ombudsman, discovery from the ombudsman, or introduction into evidence through the ombudsman in a civil
or criminal proceeding in which the ombudsman is not a legal party. Nothing in this subsection (1)(a)(I)(C) restricts or limits the right to discover or use in a civil or criminal action evidence that is
discoverable independent of the proceedings of the ombudsman.

In investigating a complaint, the ombudsman has the authority to request, access, and review any information, records, or documents, including records of third parties, that the ombudsman deems necessary to conduct a thorough and independent review of
a complaint so long as either the state department or a county department would be entitled to access or receive such information, records, or documents.

In the course of investigating a complaint pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) of this section that is related to a child fatality, near fatality, or incident of egregious abuse or neglect against a child, as defined in section 26-1-139 (2), upon request,
the state department of human services' child fatality review team, pursuant to section 26-1-139 (5)(e), shall provide the ombudsman the final confidential, case-specific review report.

In the course of investigating a complaint pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) of this section that is related to a child fatality, upon request, the department of public health and environment's child fatality prevention review team, pursuant to section
25-20.5-405, shall provide the ombudsman with the nonidentifying case review findings and recommendations.

The ombudsman must have access to all information, records, or documents described in subsection (1)(a)(II)(A) of this section created in an investigation of an event or incident described in subsection (1)(a)(II)(A), (1)(a)(II)(B), or (1)(a)(II)(C) of
this section occurring in the state from any entity, including but not limited to a coroner's office, law enforcement agency, hospital, court, the office of state registrar of vital statistics described
in section 25-2-103, and a state-licensed out-of-home placement provider, as defined in section 26-5-104.

The ombudsman shall request, review, and receive copies of records as described in subsections (1)(a)(II)(A), (1)(a)(II)(B), and (1)(a)(II)(C) of this section without cost if electronic records are not available.

Nothing in the provisions of subsection (1)(a)(II)(A), (1)(a)(II)(B), or (1)(a)(II)(C) of this section grants subpoena power to the ombudsman for purposes of investigating a complaint pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(II)(A), (1)(a)(II)(B), or (1)(a)(II)(C)
of this section.

The ombudsman shall refer any complaints relating to the judicial department and judicial proceedings, including but not limited to complaints concerning the conduct of judicial officers or attorneys of record, judicial determinations, and court processes
and procedures to the appropriate entity or agency within the judicial department.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the ombudsman may self-initiate an independent and impartial investigation and ongoing review of the safety and well-being of an unaccompanied immigrant child who lives in a state-licensed
residential child care facility, as defined in section 26-6-903, and who is in the custody of the office of refugee resettlement of the federal department of health and human services as set forth in 8 U.S.C. sec.
1232 et seq. The ombudsman may seek resolution of such investigation and ongoing review, which may include, but need not be limited to, referring an investigation and ongoing review to the state department or appropriate
agency or entity and making a recommendation for action relating to an investigation and ongoing review.

In self-initiating an investigation and ongoing review of the safety and well-being of an unaccompanied immigrant child who lives in a state-licensed residential child care facility, the ombudsman has the authority to request, review, and receive copies
of any information, records, or documents, including records of third parties, that the ombudsman deems necessary to conduct a thorough and independent investigation and ongoing review as described in subsection
(1)(a.5)(I) of this section, without cost to the ombudsman.

A state-licensed residential child care facility shall notify the ombudsman and the state department within three days after the arrival of an unaccompanied immigrant child.

The ombudsman may create and distribute outreach materials to a state-licensed residential child care facility and to individuals who may have regular contact with an unaccompanied immigrant child.

As used in this subsection (1)(a.5), "unaccompanied immigrant child" means a child under the age of eighteen years, without lawful immigration status in the United States, who has been designated an unaccompanied child and transferred to the custody of
the office of refugee resettlement of the federal department of health and human services pursuant to federal law.

To evaluate and make a recommendation to the executive director and any appropriate agency or entity for the creation of a statewide grievance policy that is accessible by children and families within the child protection system and that is transparent
and accountable;

To report, as required by the provisions of section 19-3.3-108, concerning the actions of the ombudsman related to the goals and duties of the office;

To review the memorandum of understanding between the office and the judicial department and renegotiate such memorandum of understanding at any time as the office and the judicial department mutually deem appropriate;

To act on behalf of the office and serve as signator for the office;

To ensure accountability and consistency in the operating policies and procedures, including reasonable rules to administer the provisions of this article and any other standards of conduct and reporting requirements as provided by law; and

To serve or designate a person to serve on the youth restraint and seclusion working group pursuant to section 26-20-110 (1)(i).

The ombudsman has the following powers, at a minimum:

To review issues raised by members of the community relating to child protection policies or procedures and make recommendations to the appropriate agency or entity concerning those issues;

To review and evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of any existing grievance resolution mechanisms and to make recommendations to the general assembly, executive director, and any appropriate agency or entity for the improvement of the grievance
resolution mechanisms;

To help educate the public concerning child maltreatment and the role of the community in strengthening families and keeping children safe;

To promote best practices and effective programs relating to a publicly funded child protection system and to work collaboratively with county departments, when appropriate, regarding improvement of processes;

To recommend to the general assembly, the executive director, and any appropriate agency or entity statutory, budgetary, regulatory, and administrative changes, including systemic changes, to improve the safety of and promote better outcomes for children
and families receiving child protection services in Colorado; and

To request, access, and review information, records, or documents received pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section.

The ombudsman, employees of the office, and any persons acting on behalf of the office shall comply with all state and federal confidentiality laws that govern the department of early childhood, the state department, or a county department with respect
to the treatment of confidential information or records and the disclosure of such information and records.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to direct or authorize the ombudsman to intervene in any criminal or civil judicial proceeding or to interfere in a criminal investigation.

In the performance of the ombudsman's duties, the ombudsman shall act independently of the division within the department of early childhood that is responsible for child care, of the divisions within the state department that are responsible for child
welfare or youth services, of the county departments of human or social services, and of all judicial agencies, including, but not limited to, the office of the child's representative, the office of the respondent parents' counsel,
the office of state public defender, the office of alternate defense counsel, and the office of attorney regulation counsel. Any recommendations made by the ombudsman or positions taken by the ombudsman do not reflect those of
the department of early childhood, state department, judicial department, or county departments of human or social services.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 976, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2014:
IP(1) and IP(2) amended, (SB 14-201), ch. 280, p. 1137, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2015:
(1)(a)(I)(A), (1)(a)(II)(B), (1)(c), (2)(b), (2)(e), (3), and (5) amended, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, pp. 1026, 1031, §§ 2, 15, effective June 2.

L. 2016:
(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(f) added, (SB 16-013), ch. 102, p. 294, § 2, effective April 15.

L. 2017:
(5) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1978, § 43, effective June 6.

L. 2018:
(1)(e) and (1)(f) amended and (1)(g) added, (HB 18-1010), ch. 25, p. 283, § 4, effective March 7.

L. 2021:
(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), (2)(d), and (2)(e) amended and (2)(f) added, (HB 21-1272), ch. 324, p. 1984, § 1, effective June 24; (1)(a.5) added, (HB 21-1313), ch. 416, p. 2768, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 2022:
(1)(a)(II)(D), (1)(a.5)(I), (3), and (5) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 836, § 42, effective July 1.

19-3.3-104. Qualified immunity.

The ombudsman and employees or persons acting on behalf of the office are immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacities, for any claim for damage to or loss of property, or for personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of employment, duties, or responsibilities pertaining to the office, including but not limited to issuing reports or recommendations;
except that nothing in this section shall be construed to protect such persons from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of that person.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 978, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2015:
Entire section amended, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, p. 1032, § 16, effective June 2.

19-3.3-105. Advisory work group - development of plan for autonomy and accountability - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 978, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2014:
Entire section R&RE, (SB 14-201), ch. 280, p. 1135, § 1, effective May 29.

Editor's note:
Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2014, p. 1135.)

19-3.3-106. Award of contract - extension - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 979, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2014:
(1)(a) amended, (SB 14-201), ch. 280, p. 1137, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 2015:
Entire section amended, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, p. 1027, § 3, effective June 2.

Editor's note:
Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2015, p. 1027.)

19-3.3-107. Child protection ombudsman program fund - created - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 980, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2015:
(4) amended and (5) added, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, p. 1027, § 4, effective June 2.

Editor's note:
Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2015, p. 1027.)

19-3.3-108. Office of the child protection ombudsman - annual report.

On or before September 1 of each year, commencing with the September 1 following the first fiscal year in which the office was established, the ombudsman shall prepare a written report that must include, but need not be limited to, information from the
preceding fiscal year and any recommendations concerning the following:

Actions taken by the ombudsman relating to the duties of the office set forth in section 19-3.3-103;

Statutory, regulatory, budgetary, or administrative changes relating to child protection, including systemic changes, to improve the safety of and promote better outcomes for children and families receiving child welfare services in Colorado;

Results of the ombudsman's self-initiated investigation and ongoing review of the safety and well-being of an unaccompanied immigrant child who is housed in a state-licensed residential child care facility, as described in section 19-3.3-103.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the ombudsman shall distribute the written report to the governor, the chief justice, the board, and the general assembly. The ombudsman shall present the report to the health and human services committees
of the house of representatives and of the senate, or any successor committees.

The ombudsman shall post the annual report on the office of the child protection ombudsman's website and the general assembly's website.

The ombudsman shall present or communicate quarterly updates to the board on the activities of the office.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 980, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2015:
IP(1), (1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, pp. 1028, 1027, §§ 7, 5, effective June 2.

L. 2016:
(2) amended and (4) added, (SB 16-013), ch. 102, p. 295, § 3, effective April 15.

L. 2017:
(2) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 521, § 6, effective August 9.

L. 2021:
IP(1) amended and (1)(c) added, (HB 21-1313), ch. 416, p. 2769, § 2, effective July 2.

19-3.3-109. Review by the state auditor's office.

At the discretion of the legislative audit committee, the state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance and fiscal audit of the office.

Source:

L. 2010:
Entire article added, (SB 10-171), ch. 225, p. 981, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 2014:
Entire section amended, (SB 14-201), ch. 280, p. 1138, § 5, effective May 29.

L. 2015:
Entire section amended, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, p. 1028, § 8, effective June 2.

L. 2016:
Entire section amended, (SB 16-013), ch. 102, p. 295, § 4, effective April 15.

19-3.3-110. Funding recommendations.

The ombudsman shall make funding recommendations to the joint budget committee of the general assembly for the operation of the office of the child protection ombudsman. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations, in such amount and form as
the general assembly determines appropriate, for the operation of the office.

Source:

L. 2015:
Entire section added, (SB 15-204), ch. 264, p. 1028, § 6, effective June 2.

19-3.3-111. Task force to prevent youth from running from out-of-home placement - creation - membership - duties - report - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.

"Children who have run away" means a child who has left and remains away from out-of-home placement without the permission of the child's parent, caregiver, or legal guardian.

"Institution of higher education" means a postsecondary institution that enters into an agreement with the child protection ombudsman to perform research and conduct focus groups.

"Out-of-home placement" means placement in a residential child care facility or foster care home, as each is defined in section 26-6-102.

"Out-of-home placement provider" or "provider" includes a licensed out-of-home placement provider and a foster parent approved by a county department of human or social services.

"Task force" means the Timothy Montoya task force to prevent children from running away from out-of-home placement, established in this section.

There is created in the office of the child protection ombudsman the Timothy Montoya task force to prevent children from running away from out-of-home placement. The task force is established to analyze the root causes of why children run away from out-of-home
placement; develop a consistent, prompt, and effective response to recover missing children; and address the safety and well-being of a child upon the child's return to out-of-home placement.

The office shall enter into an agreement with an institution of higher education with experience in child welfare research to perform research to support the task force's work and conduct the focus groups described in subsection (6) of this section.

The task force consists of the following members:

The child protection ombudsman, or the ombudsman's designee;

The executive director of the department of human services, or the executive director's designee;

A representative of the division of youth services within the state department of human services, appointed by the executive director of the department of human services;

A representative of the division of child welfare within the state department of human services, appointed by the executive director of the department of human services;

The director of the office of the child's representative, or the director's designee;

The executive director of the department of public safety, or the executive director's designee; and

The following members, appointed by the child protection ombudsman:

Two members who represent a county department of human or social services that delivers child welfare services, one who must be from an urban county and the other from a rural county;

A representative from a statewide organization that supports victims of human trafficking;

A representative from a statewide association that represents directors of county human or social services agencies;

Two foster parents certified by a county department of human or social services;

Two kinship providers certified by a county department of human or social services;

A representative of a statewide association that represents child placement agencies, as defined in section 26-6-102;

A representative of a statewide association of family and children's agencies;

A representative of an out-of-home placement provider that serves children in the child welfare system;

A young adult who is under twenty-two years of age who has experienced residential care placement;

Two members who are a parent or family member of a child who has run away from out-of-home placement;

A representative of a nonprofit organization that serves children or youth who have run away from out-of-home placement;

A representative of the chiefs of police, recommended by the president of a statewide organization representing the chiefs of police; and

Two representatives of police officers, one of whom must be from a rural jurisdiction and one of whom must be from an urban jurisdiction, both recommended by the president of a statewide organization representing police officers.

In making appointments pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(VII) of this section, the child protection ombudsman shall select members who represent diverse geographic locations, race and ethnicity, gender, religion, and socioeconomic status.

The appointing authorities shall make their appointments on or before September 1, 2022. The term of the appointment is for the duration of the task force. The appointing authority shall fill any vacancy subject to the same qualifications as the initial
appointment.

Each member of the task force serves without compensation. Members appointed pursuant to subsections (3)(a)(VII)(D), (3)(a)(VII)(E), (3)(a)(VII)(I), and (3)(a)(VII)(J) of this section may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred while serving on
the task force.

The child protection ombudsman, or the ombudsman's designee, is the chair of the task force. At its first meeting, the task force shall select a vice-chair from among its members. The chair and the vice-chair serve for the duration of the task force.

The child protection ombudsman shall convene the first meeting of the task force no later than October 1, 2022. The task force shall meet at least once every two months until the task force submits its final report described in subsection (7)(b) of this
section, and additionally at the call of the chair as necessary to complete its duties. The task force may meet electronically. The office shall provide staff support necessary for the advisory group to carry out its duties. At
the request of the task force, the institution of higher education shall perform research to support the task force's work.

The task force shall:

Analyze the sufficiency of statewide data that measures the quantitative and qualitative experiences of children who have run away from out-of-home placement;

Analyze the root causes of why children run away from out-of-home placement;

Identify and analyze behaviors that constitute running away from out-of-home placement, analyze differences between runaway behavior and age-appropriate behaviors outside of the home or out-of-home placement, and identify behaviors that should lead to
a person or facility filing a missing person report about a child;

Analyze the relationship between children who have run away from out-of-home placement and the likelihood that the child will become a victim of crime;

Analyze the comprehensiveness and effectiveness of existing state laws and regulations, and placement facility protocols, to respond to a child's threat to run away from out-of-home placement and for promptly reporting, locating, evaluating, and treating
children who have run away;

Analyze best practices statewide and nationally for preventing and addressing runaway behavior, including identifying methods to deter children from running away from out-of-home placement;

Analyze how entities responsible for the care of children who run away from out-of-home placement can coordinate a thorough and consistent response to runaway behaviors;

Identify resources necessary to improve or facilitate communication and coordinated efforts related to children who run away from out-of-home placement among out-of-home placement facilities, county departments of human or social services, and law enforcement
agencies; and

At its discretion, develop recommendations to reduce the number of children who run away from out-of-home placement and include the recommendations in its reports described in subsection (7) of this section.

The institution of higher education shall conduct focus groups with children in out-of-home placement and young adults under twenty-two years of age who have aged out of the child protection system to assist the task force in fulfilling its duties. The
institution shall conduct focus groups with out-of-home placement providers to determine what conditions lead children to run away from out-of-home placement, the provider's efforts to locate children who have run away,
and the services provided to a runaway child upon the child's return.

The institution of higher education shall ask each focus group to consider:

The reasons why children run away from out-of-home placement;

Opportunities and resources that could prevent children from running away from out-of-home placement; and

Resources that children need to ensure their safety and well-being after they return to out-of-home placement.

The office shall reimburse each focus group participant who is a child or youth for the participant's reasonable expenses incurred for participating in a focus group.

The institution of higher education shall make information learned from the focus groups publicly available and shall submit its findings to the task force on or before April 1, 2023. Personally identifiable information about the persons who participated
in a focus group is confidential, and the institution shall not make public any personally identifiable information.

On or before October 1, 2023, the task force shall submit a first-year status report to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services
committee and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees. The first-year status report must include a summary of the task force's work and the task force's initial findings and recommendations,
if available.

On or before October 1, 2024, the task force shall submit a final report to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee
and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees, that includes a summary of the task force's work and the task force's recommendations, if applicable.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2025.

Source:

L. 2022:
Entire section added, (HB 22-1375), ch. 384, p. 2742, § 1, effective June 7.